Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1 RELEASE ON BAIL
16-4-106. Pretrial services programs.

The chief judge of any judicial district may order a person who is eligible for bond or other pretrial release to be evaluated by a pretrial services program established pursuant to this section, which program may advise the court if the person is bond eligible, may provide information that enables the court to make an appropriate decision on bond and conditions of release, and may recommend conditions of release consistent with this section. The chief judge may make such order in any or all of the counties of the chief judge's judicial district.

The chief judge of any judicial district shall endeavor to consult, on an annual basis, with the county or counties within the judicial district in an effort to support and encourage the development by the county or counties, to the extent practicable and within available resources, of pretrial services programs that support the work of the court and evidence-based decision-making in determining the type of bond and conditions of release.

To reduce barriers to the pretrial release of persons in custody whose release on bond with appropriate conditions reasonably assures court appearance and public safety, all counties and cities and counties are encouraged to develop a pretrial services program in consultation with the chief judge of the judicial district in an effort to establish a pretrial services program that may be utilized by the district court of such county or city and county. Any pretrial services program must be established pursuant to a plan formulated by a community advisory board created for such purpose and appointed by the chief judge of the judicial district. Membership on such community advisory board must include, at a minimum, a representative of a local law enforcement agency, a representative of the district attorney, a representative of the public defender, and a representative of the citizens at large. The chief judge is encouraged to appoint to the community advisory board at least one representative of the bail bond industry who conducts business in the judicial district, which may include a bail bondsman, a bail surety, or other designated bail industry representative. The plan formulated by such community advisory board must be approved by the chief judge of the judicial district prior to the establishment and utilization of the pretrial services program. The option contained in this section that a pretrial services program be established pursuant to a plan formulated by the community advisory board does not apply to any pretrial services program that existed before May 31, 1991.

Any pretrial services program approved pursuant to this section must meet the following criteria:

The program must establish a procedure for the screening of persons who are detained due to an arrest for the alleged commission of a crime so that such information may be provided to the judge who is setting the bond and conditions of release. The program must provide information that provides the court with the ability to make an appropriate initial bond decision that is based upon facts relating to the person's risk of failure to appear for court and risk of danger to the community.

The program must make all reasonable attempts to provide the court with such information delineated in this section as is appropriate to each individual person seeking release from custody;

The program, in conjunction with the community advisory board, must make all reasonable efforts to implement an empirically developed pretrial risk assessment tool, to be used by the program, the court, and the parties to the case solely for the purpose of assessing pretrial risk, and a structured decision-making design based upon the person's charge and the risk assessment score; and

The program must work with all appropriate agencies and assist with all efforts to comply with sections 24-4.1-302.5 and 24-4.1-303, C.R.S.

Any pretrial services program may also include different methods and levels of community-based supervision as a condition of release, and the program must use established methods for persons who are released prior to trial in order to decrease unnecessary pretrial detention. The program may include, but is not limited to, any of the criteria as outlined in section 16-4-105 (8) as conditions for pretrial release.

Commencing July 1, 2012, each pretrial services program established pursuant to this section shall provide an annual report to the judicial department no later than November 1 of each year, regardless of whether the program existed prior to May 31, 1991. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the judicial department shall present an annual combined report to the house and senate judiciary committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, of the general assembly. The report to the judicial department must include, but is not limited to, the following information:

The total number of pretrial assessments performed by the program and submitted to the court;

The total number of closed cases by the program in which the person was released from custody and supervised by the program;

The total number of closed cases in which the person was released from custody, was supervised by the program, and, while under supervision, appeared for all scheduled court appearances on the case;

The total number of closed cases in which the person was released from custody, was supervised by the program, and was not charged with a new criminal offense that was alleged to have occurred while under supervision and that carried the possibility of a sentence to jail or imprisonment;

The total number of closed cases in which the person was released from custody and was supervised by the program, and the person's bond was not revoked by the court due to a violation of any other terms and conditions of supervision; and

Any additional information the judicial department may request.

For the reports required in subsection (6) of this section, the pretrial services program shall include information detailing the number of persons released on a commercial surety bond in addition to pretrial supervision, the number of persons released on a cash, private surety, or property bond in addition to pretrial supervision, and the number of persons released on any form of a personal recognizance bond in addition to pretrial supervision.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 828, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 2014:

(4)(c) amended, (SB 14-212), ch. 397, p. 1999, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(6) amended, (SB 17-241), ch. 171, p. 624, § 5, effective April 28.

16-4-107. Hearing after setting of monetary conditions of bond.

If a person is in custody and the court imposed a monetary condition of bond for release, and the person, after seven days from the setting of the monetary condition of bond, is unable to meet the monetary obligations of the bond, the person may file a written motion for reconsideration of the monetary conditions of the bond. The person may only file the written motion pursuant to this section one time during the pendency of the case and may only file the written motion if he or she believes that, upon presentation of evidence not fully considered by the court, he or she is entitled to a personal recognizance bond or an unsecured bond with conditions of release or a change in the monetary conditions of bond. The court shall promptly conduct a hearing on this motion for reconsideration, but the hearing must be held within fourteen days after the filing of the motion. However, the court may summarily deny the motion if the court finds that there is no additional evidence not fully considered by the court presented in the written motion. In considering the motion, the court shall consider the results of any empirically developed risk assessment instrument.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a person from filing a motion for relief from a monetary condition of bond pursuant to section 16-4-109 at any time during the pendency of the case.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 830, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-212), ch. 397, p. 1999, § 5, effective July 1.

16-4-107.5. Hearing after excluding time for speedy trial for public health emergency - repeal.

If a court grants a continuance pursuant to section 18-1-405 (6)(j) for a case that does not include a charge of a class 1, 2, or 3 felony, and the defendant is in custody for the case pending a jury trial because the defendant is unable to satisfy the monetary conditions of bond for release despite being eligible for release, the court shall order the immediate release of the defendant from custody upon a personal recognizance bond without monetary conditions.

If a court grants a continuance pursuant to section 18-1-405 (6)(j) for a case that includes a charge of a class 1, 2 , or 3 felony, and the defendant is in custody because the defendant is unable to satisfy the monetary conditions of bond for release despite being eligible for release, the court shall conduct a hearing as soon as practicable, but not longer than seven days after the court granted the continuance pursuant to section 18-1-405 (6)(j), for reconsideration of the defendant's monetary conditions of bond for release. The court shall revoke the monetary conditions of bond for release allowing the defendant to be released, unless the court concludes that the defendant threatens the safety of any other person or persons in the community, whether known or unknown, and that monetary conditions of bond for release are necessary to reasonably protect against such risk. The court may modify the monetary conditions of bond to allow the defendant to be released if the court concludes that the defendant threatens the safety of any other person or persons in the community, whether known or unknown, and that monetary conditions of bond for release are necessary to reasonably protect against such risk. Failure to comply with this subsection (2) requires the court to order the immediate release of the defendant from custody upon a personal recognizance bond with appropriate conditions of release.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1309), ch. 277, p. 1602, § 2, effective June 21.

16-4-108. When original bond continued.

Once a bond has been executed and the person released from custody thereon, whether a charge is then pending or is thereafter filed or transferred to a court of competent jurisdiction, the original bond shall continue in effect until final disposition of the case in the trial court. If a charge filed in the county court is dismissed and the district attorney states on the record that the charge will be refiled in the district court or that the dismissal by the county court will be appealed to the district court, the county court before entering the dismissal shall fix a return date, not later than sixty-three days thereafter, upon which the defendant must appear in the district court and continue the bond. Any bond continued pursuant to this section is subject to the provisions of section 16-4-109.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 830, § 2, effective May 11.

16-4-109. Reduction or increase of monetary conditions of bond - change in type of bond or conditions of bond - definitions.

Upon application by the district attorney or the defendant, the court before which the proceeding is pending may increase or decrease the financial conditions of bond, may require additional security for a bond, may dispense with security theretofore provided, or may alter any other condition of the bond. If the defendant applies to decrease the financial considerations of bond or modify bond conditions, the court shall set the application for hearing if the case is subject to part 3 of article 4.1 of title 24.

Reasonable notice of an application for modification of a bond by the defendant shall be given to the district attorney.

Reasonable notice of application for modification of a bond by the district attorney shall be given to the defendant, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Upon verified application by the district attorney or a bonding commissioner stating facts or circumstances constituting a breach or a threatened breach of any of the conditions of the bond, the court may issue a warrant commanding any peace officer to bring the defendant without unnecessary delay before the court for a hearing on the matters set forth in the application. Upon issuance of the warrant, the bonding commissioner shall notify the bail bond agent of record by electronic mail to the agent if available within twenty-four hours or by certified mail not more than fourteen days after the warrant is issued. At the conclusion of the hearing, the court may enter an order authorized by subsection (1) of this section. If a bonding commissioner files an application for a hearing pursuant to this subsection (4), the bonding commissioner shall notify the district attorney, for the jurisdiction in which the application is made, of the application within twenty-four hours following the filing of the application.

As used in this subsection (4), "bonding commissioner" means a person employed by a pretrial services program as described in section 16-4-106 (3), and so designated as a bonding commissioner by the chief or presiding judge of the judicial district.

The district attorney has the right to appear at all hearings seeking modification of the terms and conditions of bond and may advise the court on all pertinent matters during the hearing.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 830, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-049), ch. 152, p. 976, § 6, effective May 6.

16-4-110. Exoneration from bond liability.

Any person executing a bail bond as principal or as surety shall be exonerated as follows:

When the condition of the bond has been satisfied; or

When the amount of the forfeiture has been paid; or

When the surety appears and provides satisfactory evidence to the court that the defendant is unable to appear before the court due to such defendant's death or the detention or incarceration of such defendant in a foreign jurisdiction if the defendant is incarcerated for a period in excess of ninety-one days and the state of Colorado has refused to extradite such defendant; except that, if the state extradites such defendant, all costs associated with such extradition shall be borne by the surety up to the amount of the bond.

For the purposes of this paragraph (c), "costs associated with extradition" shall be calculated as and limited to the round-trip mileage between the Colorado court of jurisdiction and the location of the defendant's incarceration at the rate allowed for reimbursement pursuant to section 24-9-104, C.R.S., up to the amount of the bond.

Upon surrender of the defendant into custody at any time before a judgment has been entered against the sureties for forfeiture of the bond, upon payment of all costs occasioned thereby. A surety may seize and surrender the defendant to the sheriff of the county wherein the bond is taken, and it is the duty of the sheriff, on such surrender and delivery to him or her of a certified copy of the bond by which the surety is bound, to take the person into custody and, by writing, acknowledge the surrender. If a compensated surety is exonerated by surrendering a defendant prior to the initial appearance date fixed in the bond, the court, after a hearing, may require the surety to refund part or all of the bond premium paid by the defendant if necessary to prevent unjust enrichment.

After three years have elapsed from the posting of the bond, unless a judgment has been entered against the surety or the principal for the forfeiture of the bond, or unless the court grants an extension of the three-year time period for good cause shown, upon motion by the prosecuting attorney and notice to surety of record.

When the surety provides satisfactory evidence to the court that the defendant has been removed from the country. The court shall exonerate the bail bond if all of the following occur:

The surety files a motion requesting exoneration of the bail bond;

The surety files an affidavit along with the motion stating that the surety has received information from the United States department of homeland security, the United States immigration and customs enforcement, or a foreign consulate that the defendant has been detained or removed from the United States. If the surety is unable to obtain such information from the above sources, the surety must file an affidavit that is signed under penalty of perjury by a person with personal knowledge that the defendant has been detained or removed from the United States.

The district attorney does not object.

If the court exonerates the liability on the bail bond pursuant to subsection (1)(f)(I) of this section and the bond premium has been paid, any collateral securing the bail bond is released.

If, within fourteen days after the posting of a bond by a defendant, the terms and conditions of the bond are changed or altered either by order of court or upon the motion of the district attorney or the defendant, the court, after a hearing, may order a compensated surety to refund a portion of the premium paid by the defendant, if necessary and supported by factual findings, to prevent unjust enrichment. If more than fourteen days have elapsed after posting of a bond by a defendant, the court shall not order the refund of any premium.

Upon entry of an order for deferred prosecution as it existed before August 7, 2013, a diversion authorized by section 18-1.3-101, C.R.S., or deferred judgment as authorized in sections 18-1.3-101 and 18-1.3-102, C.R.S., sureties upon any bond given for the appearance of the defendant shall be released from liability on such bond.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 831, § 2, effective May 11; (3) amended, (HB 13-1156), ch. 336, p. 1957, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (SB 14-212), ch. 397, p. 1999, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(f) added, (HB 17-1369), ch. 379, p. 1949, § 2, effective June 6.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Bond Surety Protection Act") in HB 17-1369, see section 1 of chapter 379, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

16-4-111. Disposition of security deposits upon forfeiture or termination of bond.

If a defendant is released upon deposit of cash in any amount or upon deposit of any stocks or bonds and the defendant is later discharged from all liability under the terms of the bond, the clerk of the court shall return the deposit to the person who made the deposit.

If the depositor of the cash bond is the defendant and the defendant owes court costs, fees, fines, restitution, or surcharges at the time the defendant is discharged from all liability under the terms of the bond, the court may apply the deposit toward any amount owed by the defendant in court costs, fees, fines, restitution, or surcharges if the defendant voluntarily agrees in writing to the use of the deposit for such purpose. A defendant shall not be required to agree to apply the deposit toward any amount owed by the defendant as a condition of release. If any amount of the deposit remains after paying the defendant's outstanding court costs, fees, fines, restitution, or surcharges, the court shall return the remainder of the deposit to the defendant.

If the depositor of the cash bond is not the defendant, but the defendant owes court costs, fees, fines, restitution, or surcharges at the time the defendant is discharged from all liability under the terms of the bond, the court shall not apply the deposit toward the amount owed by the defendant in court costs, fees, fines, restitution, or surcharges. The court shall return the deposit to the depositor.

A depositor of a cash bond who is not the defendant may deposit bond funds directly with the jail. The depositor shall not be required to pay any additional fees, costs, or surcharges other than the bond amount and bond processing fee. The depositor shall not be required to apply bond funds to the defendant's inmate account for payment of the bond and shall not be required to deposit money in the defendant's name.

Upon satisfaction of the terms of the bond, the clerk of the court shall execute, within fourteen days after such satisfaction, a release of any deed of trust given to secure the bond and an affidavit that states that the obligation for which the deed of trust had been recorded has been satisfied, either fully or partially, and that the release of such deed of trust may be recorded at the expense of the record owner of the property described in such deed of trust.

If there is a forfeiture of the bond pursuant to this section, and if the forfeiture is not set aside pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the deed of trust may be foreclosed as provided by law.

If there is a forfeiture of the bond pursuant to this section, but the forfeiture is set aside pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the clerk of the court shall execute a release of any deed of trust given to secure the bond and an affidavit that states that the obligation for which the deed of trust had been recorded has been satisfied, either fully or partially, and that the release of such deed of trust may be recorded at the expense of the record owner of the real estate described in such deed of trust.

When the defendant has been released upon deposit of cash or property, upon an unsecured personal recognizance bond with a monetary condition pursuant to section 16-4-104 (1)(a) or (1)(b), or upon a surety bond secured by property, if the defendant fails to appear in accordance with the primary condition of the bond, the court shall declare a forfeiture. Notice of the order of forfeiture shall be mailed by the court to the defendant, all sureties, and all depositors or assignees of any deposits of cash or property if such sureties, depositors, or assignees have direct contact with the court, at their last-known addresses. Such notice shall be sent within fourteen days after the entry of the order of forfeiture. If the defendant does not appear and surrender to the court having jurisdiction within thirty-five days from the date of the forfeiture or within that period satisfy the court that appearance and surrender by the defendant is impossible and without fault by such defendant, the court may enter judgment for the state against the defendant for the amount of the bond and costs of the court proceedings. Any cash deposits made with the clerk of the court shall be applied to the payment of costs. If any amount of such cash deposit remains after the payment of costs, it shall be applied to payment of the judgment.

The court may order that a forfeiture be set aside, upon such conditions as the court may impose, if it appears that justice so requires.

If, within one year after judgment, the person who executed the forfeited bond as principal or as surety effects the apprehension or surrender of the defendant to the sheriff of the county from which the bond was taken or to the court which granted the bond, the court may vacate the judgment and order a remission less necessary and actual costs of the court.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to appearance bonds written by compensated sureties, as defined in section 16-4-114 (2)(c), which bonds shall be subject to the provisions of section 16-4-114.

On and after July 1, 2008, all moneys collected from payment toward a judgment entered for the state pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (6), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 832, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 2014:

(3) amended, (SB 14-212), ch. 397, p. 2000, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 19-191), ch. 288, p. 2668, § 2, effective August 2.

16-4-112. Enforcement when forfeiture not set aside.

By entering into a bond, each obligor, whether he or she is the principal or a surety, submits to the jurisdiction of the court. His or her liability under the bond may be enforced, without the necessity of an independent action, as follows: The court shall order the issuance of a citation directed to the obligor to show cause, if any there be, why judgment should not be entered against him or her forthwith and execution issue thereon. Said citation may be served personally or by certified mail upon the obligor directed to the address given in the bond. Hearing on the citation shall be held not less than twenty-one days after service. The defendant's attorney and the prosecuting attorney shall be given notice of the hearing. At the conclusion of the hearing, the court may enter a judgment for the state and against the obligor, and execution shall issue thereon as on other judgments. The district attorney shall have execution issued forthwith upon the judgment and deliver it to the sheriff to be executed by levy upon the stocks, bond, or real estate which has been accepted as security for the bond.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 834, § 2, effective May 11.

16-4-113. Type of bond in certain misdemeanor cases.

In exercising the discretion mentioned in section 16-4-104, the judge shall release the accused person upon personal recognizance if the charge is any offense for a violation of which the maximum penalty does not exceed six months' imprisonment, and the accused person shall not be required to supply a surety bond, or give security of any kind for their appearance for trial other than their personal recognizance, unless one or more of the following facts are found to be present:

The arrested person fails to sufficiently identify himself or herself; or

The arrested person refuses to sign a personal recognizance; or

The continued detention or posting of a surety bond is necessary to prevent imminent bodily harm to the accused or to another; or

The arrested person has no ties to the jurisdiction of the court reasonably sufficient to assure his or her appearance, and there is substantial likelihood that he or she will fail to appear for trial if released upon his or her personal recognizance; or

The arrested person has previously failed to appear for trial for an offense concerning which he or she had given his written promise to appear; or

There is outstanding a warrant for his or her arrest on any other charge or there are pending proceedings against him or her for suspension or revocation of parole or probation.

For a defendant charged with a traffic offense, a petty offense, or a comparable municipal offense, a court shall not impose a monetary condition of release. If the comparable municipal offense is a property crime and the factual basis reflects a value of less than fifty dollars and the offense would be a petty offense under state law, this subsection (2)(a) applies.

For a defendant charged with a municipal offense for which there is no comparable state misdemeanor offense, the court shall not impose a monetary condition of release.

After arrest, but prior to an individual consideration of bond by a judge, bonding commissioner, judicial officer, or judicial designee with the power to set conditions of release, this subsection (2) does not prohibit the release of a defendant pursuant to local pretrial release policies, including those that require payment of a monetary condition of release, if the defendant is first informed that the defendant is entitled to release on a personal recognizance bond.

Nothing in this subsection (2) prohibits the issuance of a warrant with monetary conditions of bond for a defendant who fails to appear in court as required or who violates a condition of release. If a defendant is unable to post the monetary condition of bond prior to the next individualized consideration of bond, the judge, bonding commissioner, judicial officer, or judicial designee with the power to set conditions of release shall release the person on personal recognizance.

The provisions of this subsection (2) do not apply to:

A traffic offense involving death or bodily injury or a municipal offense with substantially similar elements;

Eluding or attempting to elude a police officer as described in section 42-4-1413 or a municipal offense with substantially similar elements;

Operating a vehicle after circumventing an interlock device as described in section 42-2-132.5 (10) or a municipal offense with substantially similar elements; and

A municipal offense that has substantially similar elements to a state misdemeanor offense.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 13-1236), ch. 202, p. 834, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 2019:

IP(1) amended and (2) added, (HB 19-1225), ch. 132, p. 590, § 1, effective April 25.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3162, § 169, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1229), ch. 68, p. 341, § 12, effective March 1.